Florida, session 2026, SB1294.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 42 43 Section 1.âSubsections (7) through (14) are added to 44 section 403.0855, Florida Statutes, to read: 45 403.0855âBiosolids management.â 46 (7)(a)âLand application of bulk Class AA biosolids 47 fertilizer and biosolids compost products may not exceed the 48 appropriate agronomic rate. Land application of bulk Class AA 49 biosolids fertilizer and biosolids compost products at or below 50 the agronomic rate must be managed so that beneficial reuse, 51 rather than biosolids disposal, is the primary objective as 52 evidenced by the manner and circumstances of the application. As 53 used in this subsection, the term âagronomic rateâ means the 54 nutrient application rate established using generally accepted, 55 science-based nutrient management principles, including 56 recommendations published by the University of Florida Institute 57 of Food and Agricultural Sciences, which considers plant 58 nutrient requirements; site-specific characteristics, including 59 soil conditions; characteristics of the biosolids fertilizer or 60 biosolids compost products, including nutrient release rates and 61 soil amendment functions; other nutrient inputs applied to the 62 site; and the protection of groundwater and surface water 63 resources. 64 (b)âBulk land application of biosolids, including Class AA 65 biosolids, to the extent that such bulk land application 66 constitutes disposal, is prohibited, and violations are subject 67 to chapter 403. As used in this subsection, the term âdisposalâ 68 means the bulk land application of biosolids, including any 69 application exceeding the agronomic rate, when, considering the 70 manner and circumstances of the application, the nutrients 71 applied cannot reasonably be expected to be taken up by a crop 72 or vegetative cover during the relevant growing season, and the 73 application results in the discard of biosolids on the land 74 application site. 75 (8)(a)âThe owner or operator of a land application site at 76 which bulk agricultural land application of biosolids fertilizer 77 or biosolids compost products occurs shall maintain application 78 records for at least 5 years. Such records must be made 79 available to the department upon request and must include all of 80 the following: 81 1.âThe classification and characteristics of the biosolids 82 applied to the land application site. 83 2.âThe physical address of the land application site. 84 3.âThe quantity of biosolids transported to the land 85 application site and received by the owner or operator of the 86 land application site. 87 4.âThe date on which such biosolids were received by the 88 owner or operator of the land application site. 89 5.âThe name of the person or entity responsible for the 90 transportation of the biosolids to the land application site. 91 6.âThe quantity of biosolids applied and the portion or 92 area of the site to which the biosolids are applied. 93 7.âThe name of the person or entity responsible for the 94 physical application of the biosolids on the land application 95 site. 96 8.âThe date on which land application of such biosolids 97 occurred. 98 (b)âThe department shall require that written notification 99 of the recordkeeping requirements under paragraph (a) be 100 provided to the owner or operator of the land application site 101 at the time bulk Class AA biosolids are distributed for land 102 application. 103 (9)âThe recordkeeping requirements of subsection (8) do not 104 apply to Class AA biosolids products that have a moisture 105 content of 25 percent or less at the time of distribution for 106 use in land application and that maintain a stable, discrete 107 particulate or granular form during storage, handling, and land 108 application. Any person who distributes such biosolids for use 109 in land application shall maintain for at least 5 years and, 110 upon request, provide to the department records identifying the 111 characteristics and quantity of the biosolids distributed, the 112 portion or area of the site to which the biosolids are applied, 113 the date of distribution, and the recipient. 114 (10)âThe department shall initiate rulemaking no later than 115 November 1, 2026, to amend rule 62-640, Florida Administrative 116 Code, to implement the provisions of this section relating to 117 the bulk distribution and marketing of Class AA biosolids, 118 including provisions addressing recordkeeping at the time Class 119 AA biosolids are distributed or marketed in bulk. 120 (11)âThe University of Florida Institute of Food and 121 Agricultural Sciences shall, on a biennial basis, publish and 122 make publicly available recommended agronomic rates for the 123 beneficial reuse of bulk Class AA biosolids fertilizer and 124 biosolids compost products. The initial publication must occur 125 on or before November 1, 2027. The recommendations must be 126 informed by a review of the scientific literature and applicable 127 available agronomic guidance and must include, but need not be 128 limited to, all of the following: 129 (a)âThe characteristics of commonly produced biosolids 130 products relevant to nutrient availability and environmental 131 risk, including nutrient content, nutrient release 132 characteristics, and physical form. 133 (b)âRecommended agronomic rate ranges or application 134 approaches that account for crop type, soil conditions, 135 environmental vulnerabilities, seasonal factors, and management 136 practices. 137 (c)âThe scientific basis and degree of supporting research 138 for recommended agronomic rates, distinguishing recommendations 139 suitable for general application from those requiring site 140 specific evaluation. 141 (d)âData gaps and product types, conditions, or practices 142 for which additional field verification or research would 143 improve future recommendations, including identification of 144 relevant research priorities and associated resource 145 considerations. 146 (e)âBest practices for on-the-ground implementation and 147 verification consistent with agronomic principles. 148 (12)âA Class AA biosolids fertilizer product may not be 149 marketed or distributed for agricultural land application unless 150 the product meets all applicable requirements of chapter 576. 151 (13)âA Class AA biosolids compost product that does not 152 claim any plant nutrients or beneficial plant growth properties, 153 as described in s. 576.011(14), may not be marketed or 154 distributed for agricultural land application unless the product 155 is enrolled in and certified under the U.S. Composting Council 156 Seal of Testing Assurance Program. 157 (14)âClass AA biosolids may not be used for agricultural 158 land application unless, before land application, the product 159 meets all applicable requirements of chapter 576 as a biosolids 160 fertilizer product or meets the specifications of subsection 161 (13). 162 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect November 1, 2026.